District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.54

Reports.

(a)

On February 1 of each odd numbered year, the Commission shall submit to the Council, the Mayor, and each Councilmember a draft act, together with a report explaining its recommendations regarding compensation for the Mayor, the Chairman, and individual Councilmembers; provided, that the salary of the Chairman shall be pursuant to § 1-204.03(d). The Commission shall also make the report available to the general public.

(b)

The Commission may make recommendations as to salaries for other District of Columbia elected or appointed officials.

Mar 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1154
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-295, § 2(b), 54 DCR 1092
This section is referenced in § 1-611.57.